Tennessee, session 114, HB0677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 11, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
63-11-227. Protection of psychological data and materials.
(a) As used in this section, "test materials and test data":
(1) Means the specific test items administered to examinees; and
(2) Includes the manuals, instruments, protocols, and applicable test
stimuli.
(b)
- 2 - 002637

(1) Test materials and test data from psychological or neuropsychological
testing must be kept secure to avoid compromising the validity of the testing,
which could pose a risk to public safety.
(2) A patient may have access to test responses in the patient's record,
but must not have access to test materials and test data, which may only be
released to psychologists, senior psychological examiners, or other experts who
are properly trained in test administration and interpretation and have a legal and
ethical obligation to protect test materials. If the information was compiled in
reasonable anticipation of, or for use in, a civil, criminal, forensic, or
administrative action or proceeding, then the test materials and test data may
only be released to other psychologists and experts who are properly trained in
test administration and interpretation, and who have a legal and ethical obligation
to protect test data and test materials.
(c)
(1) To ensure the security of test materials and test data from
psychological or neuropsychological tests, during the administration of
psychological or neuropsychological tests:
(A) A third-party observer shall not be present, including, but not
limited to, a family member, attorney, or insurance representative; and
(B) Video or audio recording is not permitted.
(2) An exception to subdivision (c)(1) may be granted when the individual
being tested:
(A) Has a documented disability requiring an aide;
(B) Does not adequately speak the language in which the test is
formatted and requires a professional language interpreter;
- 3 - 002637

(C) Is a minor, and the observer's presence is deemed necessary
and appropriate by the examining licensed psychologist or other licensee
who is properly trained in test administration and interpretation to facilitate
the testing process; or
(D) Is being observed by a licensed psychologist or other licensee
who is properly trained in test administration and interpretation to facilitate
the supervision of a trainee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 002637